Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB687.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 323.1. Ineligibility for Office of School Director for Delinquent Tax Obligations.--(a) An individual who is delinquent in a tax obligation shall not be eligible to hold the office of school director in this Commonwealth.(b) The following shall apply:(1) An objection to the candidacy of an individual for office of school director who is not eligible for office of school director as specified under subsection (a) may be 1234567891011121314151617181920 presented to the court under subdivision (c) of Article IX of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the "Pennsylvania Election Code."(2) An objection to the title of office of school director for an individual who is not eligible for office of school director as specified under subsection (a) may be tried by proceedings of quo warranto as provided by law.(c) This section shall apply as follows:(1) To a candidate for the office of school director.(2) To an individual elected to the office of school director on and after the effective date of this paragraph.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Delinquent." A failure to satisfy a tax obligation for two (2) years or more and for which no legal process contesting the tax obligation is pending."Tax obligation." The obligation to pay school real property taxes assessed against an individual's primary residence or business located in the individual's school district of residence.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0687PN0703 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122